Utah statutes.
7-9-53.   Grandfathering.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Association that resides in a domicile-county" means an association
that:
(i)  operates a place of business or other physical location in the domicile-
county; or
(ii)  has at least 100 members that are residents of the domicile-county.
(b)  "Domicile-county" means the county:
(i)  in the field of membership of the credit union as of January 1, 1999; and
(ii)  in which the credit union has located the greatest number of branches as
of January 1, 1999.
(c)  "Grandfathered field of membership" means the field of membership as of
May 3, 1999, of a credit union described in Subsection (2)(d).
(2)  For each credit union formed before January 1, 1999, its field of
membership as of May 3, 1999, is determined as follows:
(a)  if the field of membership stated in the bylaws of the credit union as of
January 1, 1999, complies with Section 7-9-51, the credit union's field of
membership is the field of membership indicated in its bylaws;
(b) (i)  the field of membership of a credit union as of May 3, 1999, is as
provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) if:
(A)  the field of membership stated in the bylaws of the credit union as of
January 1, 1999, includes the residents of more than one county; and
(B)  as of January 1, 1999, the credit union's main office and any of its
branches are located in only one county in its field of membership;
(ii)  as of May 3, 1999, the field of membership of a credit union described
in Subsection (2)(b)(i) is:
(A)  the immediate family of a member of the credit union;
(B)  the employees of the credit union;
(C)  residents of the one county in which the credit union has its main office
or branches as of January 1, 1999; and
(D)  any association that as of January 1, 1999, is in the field of membership
of the credit union;
(c) (i)  the field of membership of a credit union as of May 3, 1999, is as
provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii) if:
(A)  the field of membership of a credit union stated in the bylaws of the
credit union as of January 1, 1999, includes residents of more than one
county;
(B)  as of January 1, 1999, the credit union has a main office or branch in
more than one county; and
(C)  as a result of a merger pursuant to a supervisory action under Chapter 2,
Possession of Depository Institution by Commissioner, or Chapter 19,
Acquisition of Failing Depository Institutions or Holding Companies, that is
effective on or after January 1, 1983, but before January 1, 1994, the credit
union acquired a branch in a county in the field of membership of the credit
union and the credit union did not have a branch in the county before the
merger;
(ii)  as of May 3, 1999, the field of membership of a credit union described
in Subsection (2)(c)(i) is the same field of membership that the credit union
would have had under Subsection (2)(d) except that the credit union:
(A)  is not subject to Subsection (3); and
(B)  is subject to Subsection (4)(b); and
(d) (i)  the field of membership of a credit union as of May 3, 1999, is as
provided in Subsection (2)(d)(ii) if:
(A)  the field of membership stated in the bylaws of the credit union as of
January 1, 1999, includes the residents of more than one county; and
(B)  as of January 1, 1999, the credit union has a main office or branch in
more than one county;
(ii)  as of May 3, 1999, the field of membership of a credit union described
in Subsection (2)(d)(i) is:
(A)  the immediate family of a member of the credit union;
(B)  the employees of the credit union;
(C)  residents of the credit union's domicile-county;
(D)  the residents of any county other than the domicile-county:
(I)  if, as of January 1, 1999, the county is in the field of membership of
the credit union; and
(II)  in which, as of January 1, 1994, the credit union had located its main
office or a branch; and
(E)  any association that as of January 1, 1999, is in the field of membership
of the credit union.
(3)  If a credit union's field of membership is as described in Subsection
(2)(d), beginning May 3, 1999, the credit union:
(a)  within the credit union's domicile-county, may establish, relocate, or
otherwise change the physical location of the credit union's:
(i)  main office; or
(ii)  branch;
(b)  within a county other than a domicile-county that is in the credit
union's grandfathered field of membership, may not:
(i)  establish a main office or branch that:
(A)  was not located in the county as of January 1, 1999; or
(B)  for which the credit union has not received by January 1, 1999, approval
or conditional approval of a site plan for the main office or branch from the
planning commission of the municipality where the main office or branch will
be located;
(ii)  participate in a service center in which it does not participate as of
January 1, 1999;
(iii)  relocate the credit union's main office or a branch located in the
county as of January 1, 1999, unless the commissioner finds that the main
office or branch is relocated within a three-mile radius of where it was
originally located; or
(iv)  after a voluntary merger under Section 7-9-39, operate a branch in the
county if:
(A)  the effective date of the merger is on or after May 5, 2003;
(B)  the credit union with the field of membership described in Subsection
(2)(d) is the surviving credit union after the merger; and
(C)  the credit union did not own and operate the branch before the effective
date of the merger; and
(c)  may only admit as a member:
(i)  a person in the credit union's grandfathered field of membership; or
(ii)  a person belonging to an association that:
(A)  is added to the field of membership of the credit union; and
(B)  resides in the domicile-county of the credit union.
(4) (a)  If a credit union's field of membership is as described in Subsection
(2)(b), as of May 3, 1999, the credit union may operate as a credit union
having a field of membership under Section 7-9-51.
(b)  If a credit union's field of membership is as described in Subsection
(2)(c), as of May 3, 1999, the credit union:
(i)  within the credit union's domicile-county, may establish, relocate, or
otherwise change the physical location of the credit union's:
(A)  main office; or
(B)  branch;
(ii)  within a county other than its domicile-county that is in the credit
union's field of membership under Subsection (2)(c), may not:
(A)  establish a main office or branch that was not located in the county as
of January 1, 1999;
(B)  participate in a service center in which it does not participate as of
January 1, 1999; or
(C)  relocate the credit union's main office or a branch located in the county
as of January 1, 1999, unless the commissioner finds that the main office or
branch is relocated within a three-mile radius of where it was originally
located; and
(iii)  may only admit as a member:
(A)  a person in the credit union's field of membership under Subsection
(2)(c); or
(B)  a person belonging to an association that is added to the field of
membership of the credit union, regardless of whether the association resides
in the domicile-county of the credit union.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) through (4), after May 3, 1999, a
credit union described in Subsection (2)(c) or (d) may:
(i)  operate an office or branch that is operated by the credit union on May
3, 1999, but that is not located in a county that is in the credit union's
field of membership as of May 3, 1999; and
(ii)  serve a member who is not in a credit union's field of membership as of
May 3, 1999, if the member is a member of the credit union as of March 15,
1999.
(b)  Subsection (5)(a) does not authorize a credit union to:
(i)  establish a branch in a county that is not in the credit union's field of
membership as of May 3, 1999, unless the branch meets the requirements under
this title for establishing a branch; or
(ii)  for a credit union described in Subsection (2)(d), include in its field
of membership an association that:
(A)  as of January 1, 1999, is not included in the credit union's field of
membership; and
(B)  does not reside within the credit union's domicile-county.
(6)  A credit union shall amend its bylaws in accordance with Section 7-9-11
by no later than August 3, 1999, to comply with this section.
(7)  In addition to any requirement under this section, a credit union shall
comply with any requirement under this title for the establishment,
relocation, or change in the physical location of a main office or branch of a
credit union.
